District of Columbia statutes.
16-4601.07

Notice to persons outside the District.

(a)

Notice required for the exercise of jurisdiction when a person is outside the District may be given in a manner prescribed by the law of the District for service of process or by the law of the state in which the service is made. Notice must be given in a manner reasonably calculated to give actual notice, but may be by publication if other means are not effective.

(b)

Proof of service may be made in the manner prescribed by the law of the District or by the law of the state in which the service is made.

(c)

Notice is not required for the exercise of jurisdiction with respect to a person who submits to the jurisdiction of the court.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214
This section is referenced in § 16-4601.05, § 16-4602.05, § 16-4602.10, § 16-4603.05, § 16-4603.08, and § 16-4603.10.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 108 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).